Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.170

Actions to enforce chapter—Duties of prosecuting attorneys.

The commission shall begin and conduct all civil suits which may be necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter and rules of the commission. The commission shall be represented in such suits by the prosecuting attorney of the county. In the case of combined counties any one or more of the prosecuting attorneys of each county so combined may be selected by the commission to represent it.

[ 1959 c 1 s 17 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]